Utah statutes.
19-6-904.   Decontamination specialist reporting to local health departments.

(1)  A certified decontamination specialist is required to report to the local health department the location of any property that is the subject of decontamination work by that decontamination specialist.  The report shall be submitted prior to commencement of the decontamination work.

(2)  The report under Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  sufficient information to allow the local health department to investigate and verify the location of the property, including the address and description of the property; and

(b)  a proposed work plan for decontaminating the property.

(3)  Upon completion of the decontamination process, a report certifying that the property is decontaminated shall be submitted to the local health department within 30 days.



Enacted by Chapter 249, 2004 General Session

